North Dakota, session 69, SB2085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 4.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted as
follows:
Definitions.
As used in this chapter, "swine" means domestic swine raised for breeding, feeding, or slaughter.
Purposes - Duties.
The commissioner shall:
1. Serve on behalf of the department as the official state agency to cooperate with the veterinary
services program of the animal plant health inspection services division of the United States
department of agriculture, to further the objectives of the state and to supervise the state's
participation in the United States swine health improvement plan.
2. Promote the welfare and improvement of the swine industry and the marketing of swine and
swine products within the state.
3. Adopt rules under chapter 28 - 32 as necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter .

S. B. NO. 2085 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2085.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State